Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3254.04
Improvement project areas; issuance of bonds; special assessment levy; hearing; notice; delinquent; interest.

Before issuing any improvement project area bonds pursuant to section 2-3254.02, special assessments shall be levied by resolution of the board for the improvement project area. Such levy of special assessments shall be made after the holding of a hearing by the board for which notice shall be published at least once a week for three weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the improvement project area. Such notice shall state the time and place for such meeting and that such meeting shall be held for the purpose of hearing all parties interested in the levying of assessments for special benefits by reason of the improvements. All special assessments shall become due within fifty days after the date of levy and may be paid within that time without interest. If not paid within the fifty days, they shall bear interest therefrom at the rate established by the board. Such assessment shall become delinquent in equal annual installments over a period of years which the board may determine at the time of making the levy. Delinquent installments shall bear interest until paid at the rate established by the board. If three or more installments shall become delinquent, the board may declare all of the remaining installments to be delinquent and such installments shall bear interest at the rate established by the board for delinquent installments and may be collected in the same manner as other delinquent installments.

Laws 1981, LB 388, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 136, § 4.